Washington statutes.
RCW 13.20.020

Terms of office—Removal—Vacancies.

The nonjudicial members of the board first appointed shall be appointed for the respective terms of one, two, three, and four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified; and thereafter their successors shall be appointed for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.

Any such member of the board may be removed at any time by majority vote of the judges of the superior court.

Vacancies on the board may be filled at any time by majority vote of said judges, and such appointee shall hold office for the remainder of the term of the member in whose stead he or she was appointed.

[ 2010 c 8 s 4003; 1955 c 232 s 2.]